Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.839

Fingerprint identification account.

The fingerprint identification account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from incremental charges of fingerprint checks requested for noncriminal justice purposes and electronic background requests shall be deposited in the account. Receipts for fingerprint checks by the federal bureau of investigation may also be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the cost of record checks. Only the chief of the state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. The account shall be subject to appropriation. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, funds in the account may be used for expenditures related to the upgrade of the state patrol's criminal history system. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the account may be used for building the sexual assault kit tracking system. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

[ 2019 c 415 s 964; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 969; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 928; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 955; 2014 c 221 s 916; 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 922; 1995 c 169 s 2; 1992 c 159 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective dates—2015 3rd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.15.069.

Effective date—2014 c 221: See note following RCW 28A.710.260.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: See note following RCW 13.06.050.

Findings—1992 c 159: See note following RCW 28A.400.303.